trunk/incubator/apertium-en-lv.lv.dix
    <pardef n="prpers__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>manis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>man</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>manīm</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mani</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>manī</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tevis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tev</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tevīm</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tevi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tevī</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņš</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņa</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņam</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņā</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņa</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņai</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņā</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mēs</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mūsu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mums</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mūs</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mūsos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jūs</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jūsu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jums</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jūs</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jūsos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņiem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņus</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņām</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viņām</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="refprn__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sevis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="sp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sev</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="sp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>sevīm</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="sp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sevi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="sp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sevī</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="sp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e><par n="prpers__prn"/></e>
    <e><par n="refprn__prn"/></e>
